hu: Megfigyelő szolgáltatás típusa: Nincs szükség megfigyelésre; Opcionális szakmai megfigyelés; Professzionális 24/7 megfigyelés; Önállóan felügyelt; Egyéb
ja: 監視サービスの種類: モニタリング不要; オプションの専門モニタリング; 専門24時間365日モニタリング; セルフモニター; その他
en: Monitoring service type: No monitoring required; Optional professional monitoring; Professional 24/7 monitoring; Self-monitored; Other
vi: Loại dịch vụ giám sát: Không cần giám sát; Giám sát chuyên nghiệp tùy chọn; Giám sát chuyên nghiệp 24/7; Tự giám sát; Khác
tr: İzleme hizmeti türü: İzleme gerekmiyor; İsteğe bağlı profesyonel izleme; Profesyonel 7/24 izleme; Kendi kendine izleme; Diğer
zh-TW: 監控服務類型: 無需監控; 選擇性專業監控; 全天候專業監控; 自我監控; 其他
sk-SK: Typ monitorovacej služby: Monitorovanie nie je potrebné; Voliteľné profesionálne monitorovanie; Profesionálne monitorovanie 24/7; Samomonitorovanie; Iné
nb: Overvåkningstjenestetype: Ingen overvåking nødvendig; Valgfri profesjonell overvåking; Profesjonell 24/7-overvåking; Selvovervåket; Annet
fr: Type de service de surveillance: Aucune surveillance requise; Surveillance professionnelle optionnelle; Surveillance professionnelle 24h/24 7j/7; Auto-surveillance; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de serviço de monitorização: Sem necessidade de monitorização; Monitorização profissional opcional; Monitorização profissional 24/7; Automonitorização; Outro
cs: Typ monitorovací služby: Monitorování není vyžadováno; Volitelné profesionální monitorování; Profesionální monitorování 24/7; Samokontrola; Jiné
de: Überwachungsdiensttyp: Keine Überwachung erforderlich; Optionale professionelle Überwachung; Professionelle 24/7-Überwachung; Selbstüberwacht; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип услуга за наблюдение: Не се изисква наблюдение; Опционално професионално наблюдение; Професионално 24/7 наблюдение; Самонаблюдение; Други
ro-RO: Tip de serviciu de monitorizare: Nu necesită monitorizare; Monitorizare profesională opțională; Monitorizare profesională 24/7; Auto-monitorizare; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta storitve nadzora: Nadzor ni potreben; Neobvezno profesionalno spremljanje; Profesionalno 24/7 spremljanje; Samospremljanje; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta usluge nadzora: Nadzor nije potreban; Opcijski profesionalni nadzor; Profesionalni 24/7 nadzor; Samostalni nadzor; Ostalo
zh-CN: 监控服务类型: 无需监控; 可选专业监控; 专业全天候监控; 自我监控; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de serviço de monitoramento: Monitoramento não necessário; Monitoramento profissional opcional; Monitoramento profissional 24/7; Automonitorado; Outro
sv: Övervakningstjänsttyp: Ingen övervakning krävs; Valfri professionell övervakning; Professionell dygnet runt-övervakning; Självövervakning; Övrigt
nl: Type monitoringservice: Geen monitoring vereist; Optionele professionele monitoring; Professionele 24/7 monitoring; Zelfbewaking; Andere
ko: 모니터링 서비스 유형: 모니터링 불필요; 선택적 전문 모니터링; 전문 24/7 모니터링; 자가 모니터링; 기타
pl: Typ usługi monitorowania: Monitorowanie nie jest wymagane; Opcjonalne monitorowanie profesjonalne; Profesjonalne monitorowanie 24/7; Samodzielne monitorowanie; Inne
es: Tipo de servicio de monitoreo: No requiere monitoreo; Monitoreo profesional opcional; Monitoreo profesional 24/7; Automonitoreo; Otros
fi: Valvontapalvelun tyyppi: Valvontaa ei tarvita; Valinnainen ammattimainen valvonta; Ammattimainen 24/7-valvonta; Itse valvottu; Muu
da: Overvågningstjenestetype: Ingen overvågning påkrævet; Valgfri professionel overvågning; Professionel 24/7 overvågning; Selvovervåget; Andet
th: ประเภทบริการตรวจสอบ: ไม่ต้องมีการติดตาม; ติดตามโดยผู้เชี่ยวชาญได้ตามต้องการ; ติดตามโดยผู้เชี่ยวชาญ 24/7; ติดตามด้วยตนเอง; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di servizio di monitoraggio: Monitoraggio non richiesto; Monitoraggio professionale opzionale; Monitoraggio professionale 24/7; Auto-monitorato; Altro
el: Τύπος υπηρεσίας παρακολούθησης: Δεν απαιτείται παρακολούθηση; Προαιρετική επαγγελματική παρακολούθηση; Επαγγελματική παρακολούθηση 24/7; Αυτοπαρακολούθηση; Άλλο
lt-LT: Stebėjimo paslaugos tipas: Stebėjimas nereikalingas; Neprivalomas profesionalus stebėjimas; Profesionalus 24/7 stebėjimas; Savarankiškai stebimas; Kita
ru: Тип службы мониторинга: Мониторинг не требуется; Опциональный профессиональный мониторинг; Профессиональный круглосуточный мониторинг; Самоконтроль; Другой